Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.170

Chapter violations—Agent liability.

An agent that violates this chapter is liable to the principal or the principal's successors in interest for the amount required to restore the value of the principal's property to what it would have been had the violation not occurred.

[ 2016 c 209 s 117.]